South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4392.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 34 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 34-3-120.  An institution that provides wire transfer services must charge a five-dollar fee for each international wire transfer. The fee collected must be remitted to the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----